Utah statutes.
54-18-304.   Review of land use application.
(1) (a)  A land use authority shall grant or deny a public utility's land use
permit within 60 days after filing in accordance with the provisions of Title
10, Chapter 9a, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act, and Title
17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act.
(b)  The Utility Facility Review Board may review a land use authority's land
use permit decision in accordance with Title 54, Chapter 14, Part 3, Utility
Facility Review Board.
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), if a public utility does not satisfy the
notice of intent requirements in accordance with Section 54-18-301 and public
workshop requirements in accordance with Section 54-18-302, a land use
authority may withhold a decision on a public utility's land use permit until
the public utility satisfies the notification and public workshop
requirements.
